Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.080

Procedural conduct of hearings—Rules.

All hearings shall be conducted in conformance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. After consultation with affected agencies, the chief administrative law judge may promulgate rules governing the procedural conduct of the hearings. Such rules shall seek the maximum procedural uniformity in agency hearings consistent with demonstrable needs for individual agency variation.

[ 1981 c 67 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.